Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2750.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-160. Mark S. Cruise '81 '84 Football Practice Field.
The University of Rhode Island football practice field, located at 5E West Alumni Avenue,
Kingston, RI 02881, shall hereafter be named and known as "Mark S. Cruise '81 '84 Football
Practice Field."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005886
========